Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.100

Business practices—Advertising—Penalty.

(1) Except as provided in RCW 18.27.065 for partnerships and joint ventures, no person who has registered under one name as provided in this chapter shall engage in the business, or act in the capacity, of a contractor under any other name unless such name also is registered under this chapter.

(2) All advertising and all contracts, correspondence, cards, signs, posters, papers, and documents which show a contractor's name or address shall show the contractor's name or address as registered under this chapter.

(3)(a) All advertising that shows the contractor's name or address shall show the contractor's current registration number. The registration number may be omitted in an alphabetized listing of registered contractors stating only the name, address, and telephone number: PROVIDED, That signs on motor vehicles subject to RCW 46.16A.030 and on-premise [on-premises] signs shall not constitute advertising as provided in this section. All materials used to directly solicit business from retail customers who are not businesses shall show the contractor's current registration number. A contractor shall not use a false or expired registration number in purchasing or offering to purchase an advertisement for which a contractor registration number is required. Advertising by airwave transmission shall not be subject to this subsection (3)(a).

(b) The director may issue a subpoena to any person or entity selling any advertising subject to this section for the name, address, and telephone number provided to the seller of the advertising by the purchaser of the advertising. The subpoena must have enclosed a stamped, self-addressed envelope and blank form to be filled out by the seller of the advertising. If the seller of the advertising has the information on file, the seller shall, within a reasonable time, return the completed form to the department. The subpoena must be issued no more than two days after the expiration of the issue or publication containing the advertising or after the broadcast of the advertising. The good-faith compliance by a seller of advertising with a written request of the department for information concerning the purchaser of advertising shall constitute a complete defense to any civil or criminal action brought against the seller of advertising arising from such compliance. Advertising by airwave or electronic transmission is subject to this subsection (3)(b).

(4) No contractor shall advertise that he or she is bonded and insured because of the bond required to be filed and sufficiency of insurance as provided in this chapter.

(5) A contractor shall not falsify a registration number and use it, or use an expired registration number, in connection with any solicitation or identification as a contractor. All individual contractors and all partners, associates, agents, salespersons, solicitors, officers, and employees of contractors shall use their true names and addresses at all times while engaged in the business or capacity of a contractor or activities related thereto.

(6) Any advertising by a person, firm, or corporation soliciting work as a contractor when that person, firm, or corporation is not registered pursuant to this chapter is a violation of this chapter.

(7) An applicant or registrant who falsifies information on an application for registration commits a violation under this section.

(8)(a) The finding of a violation of this section by the director at a hearing held in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, shall subject the person committing the violation to a penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars as determined by the director.

(b) Penalties under this section shall not apply to a violation determined to be an inadvertent error.

[ 2011 c 336 s 475; 2011 c 171 s 4; 2008 c 120 s 2; 2001 c 159 s 8; 1997 c 314 s 9; 1996 c 147 s 2; 1993 c 454 s 3; 1990 c 46 s 1; 1987 c 362 s 3; 1980 c 68 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 116 s 1; 1963 c 77 s 10.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2011 c 171 s 4 and by 2011 c 336 s 475, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Intent—Effective date—2011 c 171: See notes following RCW 4.24.210.

Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—2008 c 120: See notes following RCW 18.27.030.

Effective date—1996 c 147 s 2: "Section 2 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [March 25, 1996]." [ 1996 c 147 s 10.]

Finding—1993 c 454: See note following RCW 18.27.010.

Effective date—1979 ex.s. c 116: "The provisions of this 1979 amendatory act shall become effective on January 1, 1980." [ 1979 ex.s. c 116 s 2.]